North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-32 Penalties and Sentencing

12.1-32-01.
Classification of offenses — Penalties.

Offenses are divided into seven classes, which are denominated and subject to maximum penalties, as follows:

Class AA felony, for which a maximum penalty of life imprisonment without parole may be imposed. The court must designate whether the life imprisonment sentence imposed is with or without an opportunity for parole. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 12-59-05, a person found guilty of a class AA felony and who receives a sentence of life imprisonment with parole, shall not be eligible to have that person’s sentence considered by the parole board for thirty years, less sentence reduction earned for good conduct, after that person’s admission to the penitentiary.

Class A felony, for which a maximum penalty of twenty years’ imprisonment, a fine of twenty thousand dollars, or both, may be imposed.

Class B felony, for which a maximum penalty of ten years’ imprisonment, a fine of twenty thousand dollars, or both, may be imposed.

Class C felony, for which a maximum penalty of five years’ imprisonment, a fine of ten thousand dollars, or both, may be imposed.

Class A misdemeanor, for which a maximum penalty of imprisonment for three hundred sixty days, a fine of three thousand dollars, or both, may be imposed.

Class B misdemeanor, for which a maximum penalty of thirty days’ imprisonment, a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars, or both, may be imposed.

Infraction, for which a maximum fine of one thousand dollars may be imposed. Any person convicted of an infraction who, within one year before commission of the infraction of which the person was convicted, has been convicted previously at least twice of the same offense classified as an infraction may be sentenced as though convicted of a class B misdemeanor. If the prosecution contends that the infraction is punishable as a class B misdemeanor, the complaint must specify the offense is a misdemeanor.

This section shall not be construed to forbid sentencing under section 12.1-32-09, relating to extended sentences.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, § 23; 1979, ch. 177, § 2; 1995, ch. 134, § 1; 1997, ch. 132, § 1; 2013, ch. 104, § 11; 2017, ch. 164, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 186, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-32-01.1.
Organizational fines.

Any organization, as defined in section 12.1-03-04, shall, upon conviction, be subject to a maximum fine in accordance with the following classification:

For a class A felony, a maximum fine of one hundred thousand dollars.

For a class B felony, a maximum fine of seventy thousand dollars.

For a class C felony, a maximum fine of fifty thousand dollars.

For a class A misdemeanor, a maximum fine of thirty thousand dollars.

For a class B misdemeanor, a maximum fine of twenty thousand dollars.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the imposition of the sanction provided for in section 12.1-32-03, nor as preventing the prosecution of agents of the organization under section 12.1-03-03.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 116, § 24; 2013, ch. 104, § 12.

Cross-References.

Corporate criminal responsibility, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-03-02.

Collateral References.

Dissolved corporation, maintainability of criminal proceedings against, 40 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Extortion, false pretenses, or similar offenses, criminal liability of corporation for, 49 A.L.R.3d 820.

Bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official, criminal liability of corporation for, 52 A.L.R.3d 1274.

Corporation’s liability to criminal prosecution as affected by punishment or penalty imposed, 80 A.L.R.3d 1220.

12.1-32-02.
Sentencing alternatives — Credit for time in custody — Diagnostic testing.

Every person convicted of an offense who is sentenced by the court must be sentenced to one or a combination of the following alternatives, unless the sentencing alternatives are otherwise specifically provided in the statute defining the offense or sentencing is deferred under subsection 4:

Payment of the reasonable costs of the person’s prosecution.

Probation.

A term of imprisonment, including intermittent imprisonment:

In a state correctional facility in accordance with section 29-27-07, in a regional corrections center, or in a county jail, if convicted of a felony or a class A misdemeanor.

In a county jail or in a regional corrections center, if convicted of a class B misdemeanor.

In a facility or program deemed appropriate for the treatment of the individual offender, including available community-based or faith-based programs.

In the case of persons convicted of an offense who are under eighteen years of age at the time of sentencing, the court is limited to sentencing the minor defendant to a term of imprisonment in the custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

A fine.

Restitution for damages resulting from the commission of the offense.

Restoration of damaged property or other appropriate work detail.

Commitment to an appropriate licensed public or private institution for treatment of alcoholism, drug addiction, or mental disease or defect.

Commitment to a sexual offender treatment program.

Drug court program. A drug court is a district court supervised treatment program approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision with alcohol and drug testing and substance use disorder treatment in a licensed treatment program. The supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for drug court programs.

Veterans treatment docket. A veterans treatment docket is a district court supervised docket approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision with licensed treatment programs to treat substance use disorders, mental health conditions, behavioral health conditions, traumatic brain injuries, military sexual trauma, and co-occurring disorders. The supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for veterans treatment dockets.

Completion of a restorative justice program. For purposes of this section, “restorative justice program” means a system of justice which focuses on the rehabilitation of offenders through reconciliation with victims and the community at large.

Credit against any sentence to a term of imprisonment must be given by the court to a defendant for all time spent in custody as a result of the criminal charge for which the sentence was imposed or as a result of the conduct on which such charge was based. “Time spent in custody” includes time spent in custody in a jail or mental institution for the offense charged, whether that time is spent prior to trial, during trial, pending sentence, or pending appeal. The total amount of credit the defendant is entitled to for time spent in custody and any credit for sentence reduction under section 12-44.1-32 or 12-54.1-01 the defendant is entitled to must be stated in the criminal judgment.

A court may suspend the execution of all or a part of the sentence imposed. The court shall place the defendant on probation during the term of suspension.

A court, upon application or its own motion, may defer imposition of sentence. The court must place the defendant on probation during the period of deferment. An order deferring imposition of sentence is reviewable upon appeal from a verdict or judgment. In any subsequent prosecution, for any other offense, the prior conviction for which imposition of sentence is deferred may be pleaded and proved, and has the same effect as if probation had not been granted or the information or indictment dismissed under section 12.1-32-07.1.

A court may, prior to imposition of sentence, order the convicted offender committed to an appropriate licensed public or private institution for diagnostic testing for such period of time as may be necessary, but not to exceed thirty days. The court may, by subsequent order, extend the period of commitment for not to exceed thirty additional days. The court may also order such diagnostic testing without ordering commitment to an institution. Validity of a sentence must not be challenged on the ground that diagnostic testing was not performed pursuant to this subsection.

All sentences imposed must be accompanied by a written statement by the court setting forth the reasons for imposing the particular sentence. The statement must become part of the record of the case.

If an offender is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, that term of imprisonment commences at the time of sentencing, unless, upon motion of the defendant, the court orders the term to commence at some other time.

Unless otherwise specifically authorized in the statute defining the offense, a court may not include a minimum term of imprisonment as part of its sentence.

A person who is convicted of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three hundred sixty days is deemed to have been convicted of a misdemeanor. However, if an order is entered revoking a term of probation that was imposed as part of a sentence, the person is deemed to have been convicted of a felony.

A court shall order a defendant to pay fifty dollars to the department of corrections and rehabilitation at the time a presentence investigation is initiated to partially defray the costs incurred by the department for the preparation of the presentence report. The court may also order that any additional costs incurred by the department relating to the presentence investigation and report be paid by the defendant at a rate of payment up to the full costs of conducting the investigation and preparing the report as established by the department.

Before sentencing a defendant on a felony charge under section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-11, 12.1-27.2-02, 12.1-27.2-03, 12.1-27.2-04, or 12.1-27.2-05, a court shall order the department of corrections and rehabilitation to conduct a presentence investigation and to prepare a presentence report. A presentence investigation for a charge under section 12.1-20-03 must include a risk assessment. A court may order the inclusion of a risk assessment in any presentence investigation. In all felony or class A misdemeanor offenses, in which force, as defined in section 12.1-01-04, or threat of force is an element of the offense or in violation of section 12.1-22-02, or an attempt to commit the offenses, a court, unless a presentence investigation has been ordered, must receive a criminal record report before the sentencing of the defendant. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the criminal record report must be conducted by the department of corrections and rehabilitation after consulting with the prosecuting attorney regarding the defendant’s criminal record. The criminal record report must be in writing, filed with the court before sentencing, and made a part of the court’s record of the sentencing proceeding.

Except as provided by section 12.1-32-06.1, sentences imposed under this subsection may not exceed in duration the maximum sentences of imprisonment provided by section 12.1-32-01, section 12.1-32-09, or as provided specifically in a statute defining an offense. This subsection does not permit the unconditional discharge of an offender following conviction. A sentence under subdivision e or f must be imposed in the manner provided in section 12.1-32-08. If the person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the court may prohibit the person from contacting the victim during the term of imprisonment. For purposes of this subsection, “victim” means victim as defined in section 12.1-34-01.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31; 1975, ch. 116, §§ 25 to 27; 1975, ch. 120, § 1; 1981, ch. 152, § 2; 1989, ch. 158, § 2; 1989, ch. 172, § 1; 1991, ch. 116, §§ 17, 18; 1993, ch. 128, § 1; 1993, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 120, § 17; 1995, ch. 124, § 5; 1995, ch. 135, § 1; 1995, ch. 136, § 3; 1997, ch. 118, § 2; 1997, ch. 124, § 3; 2001, ch. 138, § 1; 2005, ch. 598, § 1; 2007, ch. 134, § 1; 2009, ch. 135, §
1; 2017, ch. 108, § 7, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 108, § 6, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 188, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 118, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 117, § 1, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 109, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 110, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 12.1-32-02 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 110, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2246; and Section 1 of Chapter 109, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1393.

12.1-32-02.1.
Mandatory prison terms for armed offenders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a term of imprisonment must be imposed upon an offender and served without benefit of parole when:

In the course of committing an offense, the offender inflicts or attempts to inflict bodily injury upon another, threatens or menaces another with imminent bodily injury with a dangerous weapon, explosive, destructive device, or firearm; or

The offender possesses or has within immediate reach and control a dangerous weapon, explosive, destructive device, or firearm while in the course of committing any felony offense under subsection 1, 3, or 7 of section 19-03.1-23.

This requirement applies only when possession of a dangerous weapon, explosive, destructive device, or firearm has been charged and admitted or found to be true in the manner provided by law, and must be imposed as follows:

If the offense for which the offender is convicted is a class AA, class A, or class B felony, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of four years’ imprisonment.

If the offense for which the offender is convicted is a class C felony, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of two years’ imprisonment.

This section applies even when being armed is an element of the offense for which the offender is convicted.

An offender serving a sentence subject to this section may be eligible to participate in a release program under section 12-48.1-02 during the last six months of the offender’s sentence.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 127, § 1; 1983, ch. 170, § 1; 1993, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 111, § 1; 2011, ch. 101, § 2; 2015, ch. 113, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-32-02.2.
Repayment of rewards paid by crimestoppers programs — Duties of attorney general — Qualified local programs — Disbursement of moneys collected.

After a defendant has been convicted of a felony, the court may order the defendant to repay all or part of any reward paid by a qualified local program. In determining whether the defendant must repay the reward or part of the reward, the court shall consider:

The ability of the defendant to make the payments, including any financial hardship that payment may cause to the defendant’s dependents.

Whether the information that was reported to the qualified local program substantially contributed to the defendant being charged with the offense. To the extent allowed by law, the court shall respect the confidentiality of the records of the qualified local program.

“A qualified local program” means a program approved by the attorney general to receive repayment of rewards. The attorney general shall consider the organization, continuity, leadership, community support, and general conduct of the program to determine whether the repayments will be spent to further crime prevention purposes of the program. The attorney general also shall determine that the qualified local program provides rewards to persons who report information concerning criminal activity and whether that information substantially leads to defendants being charged with felonies.

If the court determines that a defendant is capable of repaying all or any part of a reward paid by a qualified local program, the judgment must include a statement of the amount owed, the identity of the qualified local program, and a schedule, if any, of payments to be made by the defendant. The clerk of court may establish an account within which to deposit repayments of rewards and at least quarterly shall pay over to each qualified local program the sums that have been collected for the benefit of that program.

A judgment that includes a repayment of reward, either alone or in conjunction with section 29-26-22, may be docketed and thereafter constitutes a lien upon the real estate of the defendant in the same manner as a judgment for money rendered in a civil action.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 133, § 1.

12.1-32-02.3.
Mandatory sentences — Exceptions.

In addition to any other provision of law, when sentencing an individual convicted of a violation in chapter 19-03.1 for which there is a mandatory minimum sentence, the court may depart from the applicable mandatory minimum sentence if the court, in giving due regard to the nature of the crime, history and character of the defendant, and the defendant’s chances of successful rehabilitation, finds a compelling reason on the record that imposition of the mandatory minimum sentence would result in manifest injustice to the defendant and that the mandatory minimum sentence is not necessary for the protection of the public.

Subsection 1 does not apply if the individual is sentenced under section 12.1-32-02.1.

Upon departing from a mandatory minimum sentence, a judge shall report to the state court administrator who shall make available in electronic form and on the world wide web an annual report by July 1 of each year on the total number of departures from mandatory minimum sentences.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 116, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

12.1-32-03.
Special sanction for organizations.

When an organization is convicted of an offense, the court may, in addition to any other sentence which may be imposed, require the organization to give notice of its conviction to the persons or class of persons ostensibly harmed by the offense, by mail or by advertising in designated areas or by designated media or otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31.

Cross-References.

Corporate criminal responsibility, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-03-02.

Collateral References.

Dissolved corporation, maintainability of criminal proceedings against, 40 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Extortion, false pretenses, or similar offenses, criminal liability of corporation for, 49 A.L.R.3d 820.

Bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official, criminal liability of corporation for, 52 A.L.R.3d 1274.

12.1-32-03.1.
Procedure for trial of infraction — Incidents.

Except as provided in this subsection, all procedural provisions relating to the trial of criminal cases as provided in the statutes or rules relating to criminal procedure shall apply to the trial of a person charged with an infraction. A person charged with an infraction is not entitled to be furnished counsel at public expense nor to have a trial by jury unless the person may be subject to a sentence of imprisonment under subsection 7 of section 12.1-32-01.

Except as provided in this title, all provisions of law and rules of criminal procedure relating to misdemeanors shall apply to infractions, including, but not limited to, the powers of law enforcement officers, the jurisdiction of courts, the periods for commencing action and bringing a case to trial, and the burden of proof.

Following conviction of an infraction, the offender may be sentenced in accordance with subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-02, except that a term of imprisonment may not be imposed except in accordance with subsection 3 of section 12.1-32-05, or subsection 7 of section 12.1-32-01.

If a statute provides that conduct is an infraction without specifically including a requirement of culpability, no culpability is required.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 116, § 28.

12.1-32-04.
Factors to be considered in sentencing decision.

The following factors, or the converse thereof where appropriate, while not controlling the discretion of the court, shall be accorded weight in making determinations regarding the desirability of sentencing an offender to imprisonment:

The defendant’s criminal conduct neither caused nor threatened serious harm to another person or his property.

The defendant did not plan or expect that his criminal conduct would cause or threaten serious harm to another person or his property.

The defendant acted under strong provocation.

There were substantial grounds which, though insufficient to establish a legal defense, tend to excuse or justify the defendant’s conduct.

The victim of the defendant’s conduct induced or facilitated its commission.

The defendant has made or will make restitution or reparation to the victim of his conduct for the damage or injury which was sustained.

The defendant has no history of prior delinquency or criminal activity, or has led a law-abiding life for a substantial period of time before the commission of the present offense.

The defendant’s conduct was the result of circumstances unlikely to recur.

The character, history, and attitudes of the defendant indicate that he is unlikely to commit another crime.

The defendant is particularly likely to respond affirmatively to probationary treatment.

The imprisonment of the defendant would entail undue hardship to himself or his dependents.

The defendant is elderly or in poor health.

The defendant did not abuse a public position of responsibility or trust.

The defendant cooperated with law enforcement authorities by bringing other offenders to justice, or otherwise cooperated.

Nothing herein shall be deemed to require explicit reference to these factors in a presentence report or by the court at sentencing.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31.

12.1-32-04.1.
Gross sexual imposition — Deferred imposition of sentence.

A person who violates subdivision d of subsection 1 or subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 12.1-20-03 may not receive a deferred imposition of sentence unless that person proves at sentencing by clear and convincing evidence that that person reasonably believed the victim to be fifteen years of age or older.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 122, § 4.

12.1-32-05.
Imposition of fine — Response to nonpayment.

The court, in making a determination of the propriety of imposing a sentence to pay a fine, shall consider the following factors:

The ability of the defendant to pay without undue hardship.

Whether the defendant, other than a defendant organization, gained money or property as a result of commission.

Whether the sentence to pay a fine will interfere with the defendant’s capacity to make restitution.

Whether a sentence to pay a fine will serve a valid rehabilitative purpose.

The court may allow the defendant to pay any fine imposed in installments. When a defendant is sentenced to pay a fine, the court shall not impose at the same time an alternative sentence to be served in the event that the fine is not paid.

If the defendant does not pay the fine, or make any required partial payment, the court, upon motion of the prosecuting attorney or on its own motion, may issue an order to show cause why the defendant should not be imprisoned for nonpayment. Unless the defendant shows that his default is excusable, the court may sentence him to the following periods of imprisonment for failure to pay a fine:

If the defendant was convicted of a misdemeanor, to a period not to exceed thirty days.

If the defendant was convicted of a felony, to a period not to exceed six months.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 31.

12.1-32-06.
Incidents of probations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 158, § 18.

12.1-32-06.1.
Length and termination of probation — Additional probation for violation of conditions — Penalty.

Except as provided in this section, the length of unsupervised probation imposed in conjunction with a sentence to probation or a suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence may not extend for more than five years for a felony and two years for a misdemeanor or infraction from the later of the date of:

The order imposing probation;

The defendant’s release from incarceration; or

Termination of the defendant’s parole.

Except as provided in this section, the length of supervised probation imposed in conjunction with a sentence of probation or a suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence may not extend for more than five years for a felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-09.1, a felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-02.1, which involves the use of a firearm or dangerous weapon, a second or subsequent violation of section 12.1-17-07.1, a second or subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection order, a violation of chapter 12.1-41, or a violation of section 14-09-22; three years for any other felony offense; two years for a class A misdemeanor; and three hundred sixty days for a class B misdemeanor offense from the later of the date of:

The order imposing probation;

The defendant’s release from incarceration; or

Termination of the defendant’s parole.

If the defendant has pled or been found guilty of an offense for which the court imposes a sentence of restitution or reparation for damages resulting from the commission of the offense, the court may, following a restitution hearing pursuant to section 12.1-32-08, impose additional periods of unsupervised probation not to exceed five years for each additional period imposed.

If the defendant has pled or been found guilty of a felony sexual offense in violation of chapter 12.1-20, the court shall impose at least five years but not more than ten years of supervised probation to be served after sentencing or incarceration. If the defendant has pled or been found guilty of a class AA felony sexual offense in violation of section 12.1-20-03 or 12.1-20-03.1, the court may impose lifetime supervised probation on the defendant. If the defendant has pled or been found guilty of a misdemeanor sexual offense in violation of chapter 12.1-20, the court may impose additional periods of probation not to exceed two years for each additional period imposed. If the unserved portion of the defendant’s maximum period of incarceration is less than one year, a violation of the probation imposed under this subsection is a class A misdemeanor.

If the defendant has pled or been found guilty of abandonment or nonsupport of spouse or children, the period of probation may be continued for as long as responsibility for support continues.

In felony and misdemeanor cases, in consequence of violation of probation conditions, the court may impose additional probation if the defendant has not served the maximum sentence of imprisonment available to the court at the time of initial sentencing or deferment or the total time on probation authorized under this section.

For class B and greater felony offenses, an offense subject to section 12.1-32-09.1, a felony offense subject to section 12.1-32-02.1, which involves the use of a firearm or dangerous weapon, a second or subsequent violation of section 12.1-17-07.1, a second or subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection order, a violation of chapter 12.1-41, or a violation of section 14-09-22, the total time on probation may not exceed ten years.

For all other felony offenses, the total time on probation may not exceed five years.

For misdemeanor cases, the total time on probation may not exceed three years.

The court shall allow the defendant credit for a sentence of probation from the date the defendant began probation until the date a petition to revoke probation was filed with the court. If the defendant is on supervised probation, the defendant is not entitled to credit for a sentence of probation for any period the defendant has absconded from supervision. The total amount of credit a defendant is entitled to for time spent on probation must be stated in the criminal judgment or order of revocation of probation.

The court may terminate a period of probation and discharge the defendant at any time earlier than that provided in subsection 1 if warranted by the conduct of the defendant and the ends of justice.

Notwithstanding the fact that a sentence to probation subsequently can be modified or revoked, a judgment that includes such a sentence constitutes a final judgment for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 158, § 3; 1995, ch. 135, § 2; 1995, ch. 137, § 1; 1997, ch. 124, § 4; 2005, ch. 115, § 4; 2007, ch. 123, § 4; 2015, ch. 114, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.